Utah statutes.
56-1-2.   Articles of incorporation -- Contents.

The articles of incorporation of a railroad corporation proposing to purchase or construct a railroad shall include, in addition to the matters required to be stated in the articles of incorporation of corporations organized for pecuniary profit, the names of the places between which and of the counties through or in which such railroad lies or will be constructed, and a statement of its length as near as may be.



No Change Since 1953

